apertium-khk.khk.twol
Alphabet
 А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О Ө П Р С Т У Ү Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Ь Ы Ъ Э Ю Я
 а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о ө п р с т у ү ф х ц ч ш ь ы ъ э ю я
 %0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9
 %{ң%}:н %{В%}:в %{Т%}:т %{Д%}:д %{Н%}:н %{Ж%}:ж ! consonants
 %{г%}:0 %{й%}:0 %{а%}:0 %{ь%}:0 %{н%}:0 ! disappearing stuff
 %{ъ%}:0                                 ! "
 %{А%}:а %{I%}:ы %{У%}:у                 ! Vowels
 %{Р%}:р
 %{А1%}:а %{А2%}:а                       ! new {А} vowels
 ° %% %, %. %- %>:0 %  %+                ! punctuation and boundaries
 ;

Sets

Aleph = А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О Ө П Р С Т У Ү Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Ь Ы Ъ Э Ю Я
        а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о ө п р с т у ү ф х ц ч ш ь ы ъ э ю я ;

Vow =      и ү э ө а о у ы
           И Ү Э Ө А О У Ы ;

FrontVow = ү э ө
           Ү Э Ө ;

BackVow = у а о
          У А О ;

Sonorant = в г р л н м
           В Г Р Л Н М ;

Voiced = М Н Г Л Б В Р
         м н г л б в р ; ! the "монгол бавар" letters

NonVow = Б В Г Д Е Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Ь Ъ Я
         б в г д е ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш ь ъ я ; ! This is for surface forms only, so no archiphonemes

Cons = Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Ь Ъ
       б в г д ж з к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш ь ъ ; 

!PalCons =  г ж ш ;
PalConsA =  ч ж ш ;
PalConsI =  ч ж ш г е;

Nasal = н м ;

Y = е я ё ;


Rules

!!!! G stuff !!!!

"G epenthesis"
%{г%}:г <=> [ [ :Vow :Vow ] | %{ң%}: ]/:0 _ ;        ! дүүгийн, (нохойн), санг
               [ :Vow [ :Vow | :й ] ] %>: _ %{А1%}: ; ! дүүгээс, нохойгоос


!!!! I stuff !!!!

"{I} as и instead of ы"
%{I%}:и <=> :FrontVow [ :NonVow* [ :NonVow - :й ] ]/:0* _ ;
            :PalConsI/[ :0 - BackVow: ] _ ;    ! цаг>{I}{й}г:цагийг
                                               ! алга>{I}{й}г:алгыг
            FrontVow:0 %>: _ ;                 ! өнгө>{I}{й}г:өнгийг
            (:NonVow) [ :и | :е ] [ :NonVow* [ :NonVow - :й ] ]/:0* _ ;
                                               ! жил>{I}{й}г:жилийг
        except
         :Vow :й/:0 _ ; ! нохойг, далайг
            :Vow/:0 _ ; ! хүүг, дүүг, not ангийг
          %{ң%}:/:0 _ ; ! үзэсгэлэнг, санг

"{I} deletion after diphthongs, longvowels, {ң}, and [ExtraN after diphthong]"
%{I%}:0 <=>   :Vow :й/:0 _ ; ! нохойг, далайг
                 :Vow/:0 _ ; ! хүүг, дүүг, not ангийг
               %{ң%}:/:0 _ ; ! үзэсгэлэнг, санг
     ! :Vow :й/:0 %{Н%}:н _ ; ! толгойн, мэлхийн, гахайн
     ! I don't think this is right ... e.g., цайны (c.f. гахайны?)

"Deletion of stem-final 'short vowel' before %{I%} and %{А1%}"
Vx:0 <=> :NonVow _ %>: (%{г%}:) %{I%}: ;
                            ! алга>{I}{й}г:алгыг, өнгө>{I}{й}г:өнгийг
         :NonVow _ %>: (%{г%}:) %{А1%}: ;
                            ! Кубаас, but алганаас
     where Vx in ( а о э ө ) ;


!"I forget what this is for"
!н:0 <=> :й/:0 _ %{I%}: ;

"{й} should surface after {I} as и"
%{й%}:й <=> %{I%}:и _ ;
!      :и/:0 %{I%}:0 _ ;   ! ангийг
              :и/:0 _ ;   ! анги_йг, анги_йн

!"final short vowel deletion before vowel-initial morpheme"
!Vow:0 <=> _ %>: [ %{I%}: | %{А%}: ] ;


!!!! {A} stuff !!!!

!"{A} vowel harmony for second {А} in {А}{А}"
!%{А%}:Vy <=> [ :Vx - %{А%}: ] [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | :%  ]* %{А%}: _ ;
!         except
!             _ %{А%}: ;  ! if {A}{A}, only do second {A}
!!             ь:/:0 _ ;
!         where Vx in ( ү э ө о а у )
!               Vy in ( э э ө о а а )
!         matched ;
!
!"{A} vowel harmony for second {А} in {А}{А}"
!!%{А%}:э <=>  [ :э - %{А%}: ] :NonVow %>: %{г%}: %{А%}: _ ;
!!%{А%}:э <=>  [ :э - %{А%}: ] [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0* | :% ] %{А%}: _ ;
!%{А%}:Vy <=>  [ :Vx - %{А%}: ] [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0* | :% ] %{А%}: _ ;
!         except
!             _ %{А%}: ;  ! if {A}{A}, only do second {A}
!         where Vx in ( ү э ө о )
!               Vy in ( э э ө о )
!         matched ;
!
!             !!! а:Vx :NonVow %>: %{А%}: _ ;   ! DEBUG
!
!"{А} vowel harmony for second {А} in {А}{А} ү"
!%{А%}:э <=>  [ :ү - %{А%}: ] [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0* | :% ] %{А%}: _ ;
!"{А} vowel harmony for second {А} in {А}{А} э"
!%{А%}:э <=>  [ :э - %{А%}: ] [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0* | :% ] %{А%}: _ ;
!"{А} vowel harmony for second {А} in {А}{А} ө"
!%{А%}:ө <=>  [ :ө - %{А%}: ] [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0* | :% ] %{А%}: _ ;
!"{А} vowel harmony for second {А} in {А}{А} о"
!%{А%}:о <=>  [ :о - %{А%}: ] [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0* | :% ] %{А%}: _ ;
!!"{А} vowel harmony for second {А} in {А}{А} а"
!!%{А%}:а <=>  [ :а - %{А%}: ] [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0* | :% ] %{А%}: _ ;
!"{А} vowel harmony for second {А} in {А}{А} у"
!%{А%}:у <=>  [ :у - %{А%}: ] [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0* | :% ] %{А%}: _ ;


"Vowel harmony for {А2}"
!%{А2%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | :%  ] %{А1%}:Vow _ ;
%{А2%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | :и | :ы | :%  ] - [ %{А1%}: ] ] [ %{А1%}:Vow | %{А1%}:0 ] _ ;
         except
!             ь:/:0 _ ;
               .#. :NonVow* :и [ [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | :и (:й) | :%  ] - [ %{А1%}: ] ] [ %{А1%}:Vow | %{А1%}:0 ] _ ;
         where Vx in ( ү э ө о )
               Vy in ( э э ө о )
         matched ;

"Vowel harmony for {А2} after и stem"
%{А2%}:э <=> .#. :NonVow* :и [ [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | :и (:й) | :%  ] - [ %{А1%}: ] ] [ %{А1%}:Vow | %{А1%}:0 ] _ ;



"Vowel harmony for {А1}"
%{А1%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | :и | :ы | :%  ] _ %{А2%}: ;
         except
             .#. :NonVow* :и [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | :%  ] _ %{А2%}: ;
             ь:/:0 _ ;
             :и/:0 _ ;
         where Vx in ( ү э ө о )  ! а
               Vy in ( э э ө о )  ! а
         matched ;

"Vowel harmony for {А1} after и stem"
%{А1%}:э <=> .#. :NonVow* :и [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | [ :и (:й) ] | :%  ] _ %{А2%}: ;
         except
             ь:/:0 _ ;
             :и/:0 _ ;

"{А} vowel harmony"
%{А%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :NonVow* :Cons ]/[ :0 | ь:и | %{а%}:и ]* _ ;
         except
!             :Vx [ :NonVow* ]/[ :0 | ь:и | %{а%}:и ]* :%  [ :NonVow* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;
!             :Vx [ :NonVow* :Cons ]/[ :0 | ь:и | %{а%}:и ]* :%  [ :NonVow* ]/:0* _ ;
             :Vx [ :NonVow* :Cons ]/[ :0 | ь:и | %{а%}:и | :%  ]* :NonVow*/:0* _ ;
         where Vx in ( ү э ө о у а )
               Vy in ( э э ө о а а )
         matched ;

"{А} vowel harmony across space" ! e.g., дахь/дэх, but not дөх/дохь
%{А%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :NonVow* :Cons ]/[ :0 | ь:и | %{а%}:и | :%  ]* :NonVow*/:0* _ ;
!             :Vx [ :NonVow* ]/[ :0 | ь:и | %{а%}:и ]* :%  [ :NonVow* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;
!             :Vx [ :NonVow* :Cons ]/[ :0 | ь:и | %{а%}:и ]* :%  [ :NonVow* ]/:0* _ ;
         where Vx in ( ү э ө о у а )
               Vy in ( э э э а а а )
         matched ;

"{А} vowel harmony for Y ''vowels''"
%{А%}:Vy <=> .#. (:Cons) :Vx [ [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 ]* - Y: ] _ ;
         except
             :Cons* :и [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | :%  ] _ %{А2%}: ;
         where Vx in ( е ё и )  ! я ю
               Vy in ( э о э )  ! а а
         matched ;

"{А} vowel harmony for Y ''vowels'' across space"
%{А%}:Vy <=> .#. (:Cons) :Vx [ [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | :%  ]* - Y: ] _ ;
         except
             :Cons* :и [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | :%  ] _ %{А2%}: ;
             .#. (:Cons) :Vx [ [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 ]* - Y: ] _ ;
         where Vx in ( е ё и )  ! я ю
               Vy in ( э а э )  ! а а
         matched ;
! үе дэх
!@ ү:ү е:е _:_ д:д э:э х:х
! ёс дах
!@ ё:ё с:с _:_ д:д а:а х:х

"{А1} vowel harmony for Y ''vowels''"
%{А1%}:Vy <=> .#. (:NonVow) :Vx [ [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | :%  ] - Y: ] _ ;
         except
              .#. :NonVow* :и [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | [ :и (:й) ] | :%  ] _ %{А2%}: ;
         where Vx in ( е ё и )  ! я ю
               Vy in ( э о э )  ! а а
         matched ;

"{А2} vowel harmony for Y ''vowels''"
%{А2%}:Vy <=> .#. (:NonVow) :Vx [ [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | :%  ] - Y: ] %{А1%}: _ ;
          except
                .#. :NonVow* :и [ [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | :и (:й) | :%  ] - [ %{А1%}: ] ] [ %{А1%}:Vow | %{А1%}:0 ] _ ;
          where Vx in ( е ё и )  ! я ю
                Vy in ( э о э )  ! а а
          matched ;

!"normal {А2} vowel harmony?"
!%{А2%}:Vy <=> :Vx/:0 _ ;
!          where Vx in ( э )
!                Vy in ( э )
!          matched ;


!"first {А} becomes и after palatalised cons or и"
!%{А%}:и <=> ь:/:0 _ %{А%}: ;

"{А1} deletes after и or ь:и"
!%{А%}:0 <=> :и/[ :0 - ь: ] _ %{А%}: ;
%{А1%}:0 <=> [ :и | ь:и ]/:0 _ %{А2%}: ;

!!"{A} is э after [non-transparent] и in first syllable"
!!%{А%}:э <=> .#. [ :NonVow/:0 ]* :и [ :NonVow/:0 ]* _ ;
!!         except
!!             _ %{А%}: ;
!!             ь:/:0 _ ;


!!!! {У} stuff !!!!

"{У} vowel harmony"
%{У%}:ү <=> :FrontVow [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | %  ] _ ;
            .#. :NonVow* :и [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/[ :0 | %  ] _ ;

"{У} vowel harmony 2"
%{У%}:ү <=> :FrontVow/:0 _ ;

"first {У} deletes after и or ь:и"
%{У%}:0 <=> [ :и | ь:и ]/:0 _ %{У%}: ;


!!!! {a} stuff !!!!

!"{a} harmony"
!%{а%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :NonVow* [ :т | :д | :с | :х ] ]/:0 _ :д ;  ! улсад, байхад
!                                                               ! хүүхэд, оршилд
!                    :Vx [ :NonVow/:0 ]* [ :NonVow ]/:0 _ :х ;  ! болох
!                    :Vx [ :NonVow/:0 ]* [ :NonVow ]/:0 _ :в ;  ! болов, ирэв, etc.
!                    :Vx [ :NonVow/:0 ]* [ :NonVow ]/:0 _ :н ;  ! нэгэн
!         except
!             :PalConsA/[ :0 - ь: ] _ ;   ! avoid conflict with after palcons
!             ь: _ :NonVow/:0 [ :Vow | .#. ] ;
!             :н %>: _ :н :д ;            ! хүнд, шашинд, оронд
!             _ :NonVow/:0 :Vow ;         ! хүүхдийг, but хүүхэд
!         where Vx in ( ү э ө а о у )
!               Vy in ( э э ө а о а )
!         matched ;

"inserted {а} and its harmony"
%{а%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/:0 _ [ :Sonorant | :х ] [ :NonVow/:0 | .#. | %  | %+: ] ;
             :Vx [ :NonVow* :Sonorant ]/:0 _ [ [ :Sonorant - :г ] :NonVow* ]/:0 [ :Vow | .#. ] ;
             :Vx [ :NonVow* :Cons ]/:0 _ [ :н :д ]/:0 .#. ;
                                                 ! хүнд, шашинд, оронд
             :Vx [ :NonVow* [ :ж | :ч | :т | :ц | :с | :ш | :х | :д ] ]/:0 _ :NonVow .#. ;
             :Vx [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/:0 _ %{Ж%}:/:0 .#. ;
                                                 ! санаж, очиж
!             [ :Vx (:NonVow) :NonVow ]/:0 _ [ :NonVow :NonVow :NonVow* ]/:0 [ .#. | :Vow ] ;
             :Vx [ :NonVow* :г ]/:0 _ [ :х ]/:0 :Vow ;
         except
             [ :Vow :л ]/:0 _ [ :л :Vow ]/:0 ;   ! өгүүллийг
             [ :Vow [ [ :Sonorant - :Nasal ] (:ь) ] ]/:0 _ [ %{Ж%}: ]/:0 .#. ;    ! ирж, явч
             [ :Vow :р ]/:0 _ [ [ :н | :в ] :Vow ]/:0 ;   ! орныг, дөрвөн
             :PalConsA/[ :0 - ь: ] _ ;   ! avoid conflict with after palcons
             ь:/[ :0 - ь:0 ] _ [ :NonVow* :NonVow ]/:0* [ :Vow | .#. | %  ] ;
             [ [ :Vow (:й) ] | %{а%}: ] [ [ :л (:ь) ] | :Nasal | :Y | :р | :г ]/:0 _ [ :д | %{Д%}: ] ;
             :NonVow _ :л [ :Vow | %{а%}: ] ;
             :Vow :й :0* _ ;             ! байв, далайд, нохойд
!             :н %>: _ :н :д ;            ! хүнд, шашинд, оронд
!             _ :NonVow/:0 :Vow ;         ! хүүхдийг, but хүүхэд
!             :NonVow :й/:0 _ ;           ! далайд, нохойд
             ! ь:/[ :0 - ь:0 ] _ х: ;
                                                 ! but үенд, not үеэнд
             ь:/[ :0 - ь:0 ] _ [ х: | н: | в: ] ;
         where Vx in ( ү э ө а о у )
               Vy in ( э э ө а о а )
         matched ;
